Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-640
Notice of application; publication; objections; hearing.

Upon receipt of an application filed under section 46-639, the Chief Water Officer shall cause a notice of such application to be published at the applicant's expense at least once a week for three consecutive weeks in a legal newspaper published or of general circulation in each county containing lands on which the water well field or any part of such water well field is or is proposed to be located. The notice shall contain a description of the lands upon which such water well field is or is proposed to be located, the amount of water requested, the number of water wells constructed or proposed, and any other relevant information. The notice shall state that any interested person may object to and request a hearing on the application by filing written objections specifically stating the grounds for each objection within two weeks after the date of final publication with the Chief Water Officer.

Laws 1963, c. 276, § 3, p. 829;

Laws 1986, LB 960, § 33;

Laws 1987, LB 140, § 12;

Laws 1991, LB 278, § 3;

Laws 1993, LB 131, § 20;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 179;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 180.